Utah statutes.
41-6a-903.   Yield right-of-way -- Vehicle turning left -- Entering or
crossing highway other than from another roadway -- Merging lanes.
The operator of a vehicle:
(1)  intending to turn to the left shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle
approaching from the opposite direction which is so close to the turning
vehicle as to constitute an immediate hazard;
(2)  about to enter or cross a highway from any place other than another
highway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles approaching on the
highway to be entered or crossed; and
(3)  traveling in a lane that is about to merge into a continuing lane, shall
yield the right-of-way to all vehicles traveling in the continuing lane and
which are so close as to be an immediate hazard.
